test/src/morphology/N-nurm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nuŗm*: # Noun 96 'eng /est põld/fin' - full paradigm
     nuŗm*+N+Sg+Nom: nuŗm*
     nuŗm*+N+Sg+Gen: nurm
     nuŗm*+N+Sg+Par: nurmõ
     nuŗm*+N+Sg+Dat: nurmõn
     nuŗm*+N+Sg+Ins: nurmkõks
     nuŗm*+N+Sg+Ill: nurmõ
     nuŗm*+N+Sg+Ela: nurmstõ
     nuŗm*+N+Pl+Nom: nūrmõd
     nuŗm*+N+Pl+Gen: nūrmõd
     nuŗm*+N+Pl+Par: nūrmidi
     nuŗm*+N+Pl+Dat: nūrmõdõn
     nuŗm*+N+Pl+Ins: nūrmõdõks
     nuŗm*+N+Pl+Ill: nūrmiž
     nuŗm*+N+Pl+Ela: nūrmist
